North Carolina, session 2025, SB337.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Funds appropriated to the North Carolina Civil War & Reconstruction
History Center Foundation in S.L. 2021-180 and to the Cape Fear Historical Complex Foundation
in S.L. 2023-234 and in the Committee Reports accompanying both those acts for the North
Carolina Civil War & Reconstruction History Center (collectively, the prior appropriations) that
remain unspent and unencumbered as of the effective date of this act shall, notwithstanding any
other provision of law to the contrary, revert to the Office of State Budget and Management
(OSBM) to be reallocated as provided in Section 2 of this act. The Department of Natural and
Cultural Resources shall, within 30 days of the effective date of this act, provide an accounting
of the prior appropriations to the Joint Legislative Commission on Governmental Operations, the
Joint Legislative Oversight Committee on Agriculture and Natural and Economic Resources, and
the Fiscal Research Division.
SECTION 2. Funds reverted to the OSBM pursuant to Section 1 of this act shall be
reallocated in the following proportions, and these funds are appropriated for the indicated
purposes:
(1) Forty percent (40%) to the City of Fayetteville, to be used for community
mental health programs, pedestrian safety projects, workforce development,
and a local transportation connectivity study.
(2) Thirty percent (30%) to the Town of Hope Mills for the Town's Community
Center.
(3) Thirty percent (30%) to Cumberland County for the Gray's Creek Water and
Sewer District for water and wastewater infrastructure, expansion of youth
mental health and substance abuse treatment services, preconstruction
activities for the regional aquatic center project, the emergency services
mobile incident command unit, and for digital dispatch equipment for the
Cumberland County Fire Chiefs Association.
SECTION 3. Section 2 of this act is effective July 1, 2025. The remainder of this act
is effective when it becomes law.
*S337-v-1*